Utah statutes.
7-7-23.   Savings accounts as legal investments and as deposits.
(1) (a)  Personal representatives, administrators, executors, custodians,
conservators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries of every kind and
nature, insurance companies, business and manufacturing companies, banks,
trust companies, credit unions, and other similar types of financial
organizations, charitable, educational, eleemosynary and public corporations,
funds and organizations, may invest funds held by them, without any order of
any court, in:
(i)  savings accounts of insured associations that are under state
supervision; and
(ii)  in accounts of federal associations organized under the laws of the
United States and under federal supervision.
(b) (i)  These investments shall be considered legal investments for these
funds.
(ii)  With respect to investments by custodians, associations and federal
associations are considered "banks" within the meaning of that term as used in
Title 75, Chapter 5a, Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.
(2)  The savings accounts and other accounts made legal investments by this
section:
(a)  are acceptable for deposits of securities when deposit of securities is
required by Utah law or other legal mandate for any purpose; and
(b)  in the amount of the bond, are acceptable for security without other
security when security with a bond is required by Utah law or other legal
mandate.
(3)  The provisions of this section supplement:
(a)  any other laws relating to and declaring what are legal investments for
the persons, fiduciaries, corporations, and organizations' funds referred to
in this section; and
(b)  the laws relating to the deposit of securities and the making and filing
of bonds for any purpose.
